Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2122.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3127(b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3127. Indecent exposure.* * *(b) Grading.--[If](1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), if the person knows or should have known that any of the persons present are less than 16 years of age, indecent exposure under subsection (a) is:(i) For a first offense, a misdemeanor of the first degree. [Otherwise, indecent exposure under subsection (a) is a misdemeanor of the second degree.](ii) For a second or subsequent offense, a felony of the third degree.12345678910111213141516171819 (2) Indecent exposure under subsection (a) is:(i) For a first offense, a misdemeanor of the second degree.(ii) For a second offense, a misdemeanor of the first degree.(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, a felony of the third degree.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2122PN2745 - 2 - 12345678